test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-lehme_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

# This gold standard is automatically generated from the Votic dictionary
# at Språkbanken (https://spraakbanken.gu.se/karp/#?mode=votiska)

Tests:
  Noun - lehme :   # should decline like the paradigm 'p_päive'
    lehme+N+Sg+Nom: lehme
    lehme+N+Pl+Nom: lehmäd
    lehme+N+Sg+Gen: lehmä
    lehme+N+Pl+Gen: [lehmi, lehmije]
    lehme+N+Sg+Par: [lehmä, lehmää]
    lehme+N+Pl+Par: [lehmi, lehmii]
    lehme+N+Sg+Ill: [lehmää, lehmäse]
    lehme+N+Pl+Ill: [lehmi, lehmise]
    lehme+N+Sg+Ine: lehmäz
    lehme+N+Pl+Ine: lehmiz
    lehme+N+Sg+Ela: lehmässä
    lehme+N+Pl+Ela: lehmissä
    lehme+N+Sg+All: lehmällä
    lehme+N+Pl+All: lehmille
    lehme+N+Sg+Ade: lehmäl
    lehme+N+Pl+Ade: lehmil
    lehme+N+Sg+Abl: lehmälte
    lehme+N+Pl+Abl: lehmilte
    lehme+N+Sg+Tra: lehmässi
    lehme+N+Pl+Tra: lehmissi
    lehme+N+Sg+Ter: lehmässaa
    lehme+N+Pl+Ter: lehmissaa
    lehme+N+Sg+Com: lehmäka
    lehme+N+Pl+Com: lehmika
